Nebraska, session 109, LB729.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB729 LB729
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Biometric Autonomy Liberty Law.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds that:
(1) The use of biometric data is growing in commercial, therapeutic,
and recreational applications;
(2) The use of biometric data to identify or monitor individuals is
unlike other unique identifiers that are used in commercial and
recreational applications. Biometric data of an individual that has been
compromised leaves the individual with no recourse, a heightened risk for
identity theft, and a greater likelihood to withdraw from transactions
facilitated by biometric data;
(3) An overwhelming majority of members of the public are weary of
the use of biometric data when such data is tied to finances and other
personal information;
(4) The ramifications of biometric data technology are not fully
known; and
(5) The public's welfare, security, and safety will be served by
regulating the collection, use, safeguarding, handling, storage,
retention, and destruction of biometric data.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Biometric Autonomy Liberty Law:
(1)(a) Biometric data means data that is generated to identify a
specific individual through an automatic measurement of a biological
characteristic of such individual and includes any:
(i) Fingerprint;
(ii) Voice print;
(iii) Retina image;
(iv) Iris image; or
(v) Unique biological pattern or characteristic.
(b) Biometric data does not include:
(i) Any photograph, video recording, or audio recording, except for
data generated or collected from the biological characteristics of a
-2-

LB729 LB729
2026 2026
person depicted in any such photograph, video recording, or audio
recording; or
(ii) Information collected, used, or stored for health care
treatment, payment, or operations under the federal Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and the rules and regulations
adopted under such act;
(2) Collect means to gather, acquire, or obtain;
(3) Implantable device means a biocompatible device that can be
implanted inside the body;
(4) Possess means to have any custody of, to have any control of, to
manage the storage of, or to use;
(5)(a) Private entity means any individual, partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, association, or other group or
entity, however organized.
(b) Private entity does not include a public entity;
(6) Public entity means:
(a) The State of Nebraska or any agent acting on behalf of the State
of Nebraska;
(b) Any state or local governmental agency or any agent acting on
behalf of any state or local governmental agency;
(c) Any political subdivision of the State of Nebraska or any agent
acting on behalf of any political subdivision of the State of Nebraska;
(d) Any court of Nebraska or any judge, justice, or agent acting on
behalf of such court; and
(e) The Legislative Council or any agent acting on behalf of the
Legislative Council; and
(7)(a) Security purpose means the prevention or investigation of any
safety concern or criminal activity; and
(b) Security purpose includes:
(i) Assisting a law enforcement investigation, protecting property
from trespass, controlling access to property, or protecting any person
-3-

LB729 LB729
2026 2026
from harm, including stalking, violence, or harassment; and
(ii) Enforcement through any photograph, video recording, drug test,
or identification method.
Sec. 4. Any private entity or public entity shall not require or
coerce any individual to be subject to any implantable device.
Sec. 5. Except for biometric data collected or possessed for a
security purpose, a private entity shall not require or coerce any
individual to wear or be subject to a device of any kind that collects
biometric data.
Sec. 6. Nothing in the Biometric Autonomy Liberty Law shall be
construed to:
(1) Impact the admission or discovery of biometric data in any legal
action of any kind in any court or before any private entity or public
entity;
(2) Conflict with:
(a) The Data Privacy Act;
(b) The Genetic Information Privacy Act;
(c) Sections 71-8401 to 71-8407; or
(d) The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
of 1996 and the rules and regulations adopted under such act;
(3) Apply to emergency medical care that is covered by the Emergency
Medical Services Practice Act;
(4) Apply to facial recognition technology used by the Department of
Motor Vehicles for fraud detection;
(5) Apply to personal data regulated by the federal Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as such act
existed on January 1, 2026; or
(6) Apply to a financial institution, an affiliate of a financial
institution, or data subject to Title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15
U.S.C. 6801 et seq., as such title existed on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 7. The Biometric Autonomy Liberty Law shall not apply to any
-4-

LB729 LB729
2026 2026
information collected, used, or stored for health care treatment,
payment, or operations, including protected health information, under the
federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and
the rules and regulations adopted under such act.
Sec. 8. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
-5-